Hawaii statutes.
[§264-127]
Limitations on actions. A civil lawsuit contesting an action by the
department or a county under this part or under part VIII of chapter 46 shall
be filed within sixty calendar days after the date of the action. [L 2004, c
155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next